District of Columbia statutes.
31-911

Corporate existence.

(a)

Upon the conversion of a mutual company to a converted stock company according to provisions of this chapter, the corporate existence of the mutual company shall be continued in the converted stock company. All the rights, franchises, and interest of the mutual company in and to every type of property, real, personal, and mixed, and things in action thereunto belonging, is deemed transferred to and vested in the converted stock company without any deed or transfer. Simultaneously, the converted stock company is deemed to have assumed all the obligations and liabilities of the mutual company.

(b)

The directors and officers of the mutual company, unless otherwise specified in the plan of conversion, shall serve as directors and officers of the converted stock company until new directors and officers of the converted stock company are duly elected pursuant to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the converted stock company.

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-126, § 12, 43 DCR 1551

History

1981 Ed., § 35-4211.

Prior Codifications